Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.045

Continuance.

If upon the trial it appears that the defendant is not the owner or person in charge of such offending animals, the case shall be continued, and proceedings had as in RCW 16.04.050 provided, if the proper defendant be unknown to plaintiff.

[ 1893 c 31 s 6; RRS s 3095. Formerly RCW 16.04.050, part.]